Washington statutes.
RCW 43.210.080

Rural manufacturer export outreach program—Export loan or loan guarantee programs.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the small business export finance assistance center must:

(1) Develop a rural manufacturer export outreach program in conjunction with impact Washington. The program must provide outreach services to rural manufacturers in Washington to inform them of the importance of and opportunities in international trade, and to inform them of the export assistance programs available to assist these businesses to become exporters; and

(2) Develop export loan or loan guarantee programs in conjunction with the Washington economic development finance authority and the appropriate federal and private entities.

[ 2010 c 166 s 3.]